California statutes. Water Code
(3) The project’s nonfederal sponsor, or other appropriate local agency, shall be in compliance with Section 701b-12 of Title 33 of the United States Code, which requires the preparation, adoption, and implementation of a floodplain management plan designed to reduce the impacts of future floods. All local communities benefiting from the project shall have an ordinance consistent with the National Flood Insurance Program’s model floodplain management ordinance.

(4) The project shall avoid, minimize, or mitigate impacts to environmental and recreational values.

(5) Project planning documents shall include an evaluation of opportunities to include multipurpose objectives. The nonfederal sponsor shall accommodate other partners that provide the costs of including multipurpose objectives that the nonfederal sponsor determines are compatible with the project’s schedule and primary flood management purpose.

(b) (1) The Reclamation Board or department, in its advisory role, shall provide sufficient review and oversight in the initial scoping process, feasibility evaluation, environmental review, and project approval processes for flood management projects to determine whether the requirements set forth in subdivision (a) are met. The department or the Reclamation Board shall inform the nonfederal sponsor and any local sponsor whether the project meets the requirements set forth in subdivision (a) during the feasibility evaluation and environmental review process. Prior to state authorization, the department or the Reclamation Board shall submit a report to the Legislature that indicates whether the project meets the requirements set forth in subdivision (a).

(2) The implementation of paragraph (1) in any fiscal year is contingent upon the appropriation of sufficient funds, as determined by the department, for the purposes of carrying out that paragraph.

(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the department or the Reclamation Board may recommend, and the Legislature may authorize, flood control projects for which the total annual benefit of providing protection from flood damages does not exceed the annual cost of the project allocable to flood management if the project increases the level of flood protection for state transportation facilities or state water supply facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12583.

It is the intention of the Legislature that it will be the policy of the State that the amount of financial assistance to be given by the State to each project adopted and authorized for state assistance by the Legislature pursuant to the provisions of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part, shall be limited to the cost of land, easements, and rights of way necessary in connection with the construction of any such project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12583.1.

It is also declared to be the policy of the state that the state shall not provide financial assistance for relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities for which the owner has no legal right to be compensated for such relocation, reconstruction, or replacement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 893.)
-------------------------------------------

12584.

Notwithstanding all other provisions of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part, appropriations will be made by the State, from time to time by law, to pay for the cost of cooperation on all flood control projects as required by the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (Public, Numbered 534, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session), and by the act of Congress approved August 18, 1941 (Public, Numbered 228, Seventy-seventh Congress, First Session), and which projects have by this part prior to September 22, 1951, been adopted and authorized for state assistance by the Legislature, and for which appropriations or allocation of funds have been made by the State prior to such date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.

In the event that the Congress after September 22, 1951, authorizes and approves projects, wherein financial assistance is required of local agencies of this State by the Federal Government, similar to the provisions of Public Law, Numbered 534, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session, and such projects are recommended for state assistance by the department and approved by the Legislature, including all projects adopted and authorized by the State for which no appropriations or allocations have been made, it is the intention of the Legislature that it will be the policy of the State to pay the costs of local cooperation required by the acts of Congress, except that such costs shall be limited to the costs of all lands, easements and rights of way necessary for the construction of such projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.1.

The costs of local co-operation shall include, as to projects specifically adopted and authorized by the Congress and the Legislature, costs hereafter incurred prior, as well as subsequent, to Congressional authorization but subsequent to submission of the project report by the Secretary of the Army or other authorized official to the Congress for project authorization; but such co-operation shall apply only to costs incurred for the project as finally authorized by the Congress and the State, and such costs shall not be eligible for reimbursement by the State until after federal and state authorization and after the appropriation of construction funds by the Congress.

As to small flood control projects undertaken by the United States Corps of Engineers pursuant to Section 205 of the Flood Control Act of 1948 (Public Law 858, Eightieth Congress, 2nd Session, approved June 30, 1948), as amended, costs of local co-operation shall include costs incurred after submission of the design memorandum to the Chief of Engineers, if an allocation of funds for the project is thereafter made by the Chief of Engineers, and such costs shall be limited to costs incurred for the project as finally approved by the Chief of Engineers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2092.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.2.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12800) of this part, and this chapter, the following policy shall apply to projects authorized by the Legislature after November 10, 1969, and to small flood control projects authorized by Section 12750 for which the department made the findings required by Section 12750.1 after November 10, 1969.

(a) The state shall pay 75 percent of the costs of lands and rights or interest in lands whereon channel improvements and channel rectifications are located and of lands, rights, or interests in lands necessary in connection with the construction, operation, or maintenance of such channel improvements and rectifications, including those necessary for flowage purposes, spoil areas, borrow pits, or for access roads, apportioned to the benefits resulting from the reduction of flood damage.

(b) The local agency shall pay 25 percent of the costs of lands and rights or interests in lands whereon channel improvements and channel rectifications are located and of lands, rights, or interests in lands necessary in connection with the construction, operation or maintenance of such channel improvements or rectifications, including those necessary for flowage purposes, spoil areas, borrow pits, or for access roads, apportioned to the benefits resulting from the reduction of flood damage and all of such costs apportioned to the benefits resulting from increased or higher utilization of land.

(c) The state shall pay 90 percent of the costs of the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities rendered necessary by the project, apportioned to the benefits resulting from the reduction of flood damage.

(d) The local agency shall pay 10 percent of the costs of the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities rendered necessary by the project, apportioned to the benefits resulting from the reduction of flood damage and all of such costs apportioned to the benefits resulting from increased or higher utilization of land.

(e) The state’s portion of the costs under subdivisions (a) and (c) shall be determined by the department at or prior to the time the report recommending federal authorization is submitted to the Congress or, in the case of a small project authorized by Section 12750, at the time the report recommending federal authorization is submitted to the United States Army Chief of Engineers, except in the case of emergency flood control construction when congressional authorization and appropriation are concurrent and the normal planning procedures are not followed.

In the case of projects already having federal authorization, the state’s portion of such costs shall be determined by the department at the time state authorization is sought by the local agency.

The state’s portion shall not be changed unless there are major project changes made in the plan of improvement, in which case the department, prior to the next appropriation of state funds for the project, shall review the project and make such new determination as it deems justified by the project changes.

(f) When a project authorized prior to November 10, 1969, is so modified that it becomes subject to the provisions of Section 12639, the policy described in this section shall be applied to any portion of the modified project which the department determines to be beyond the scope of the originally authorized project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 893.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.3.

The local agency may receive credit against its share of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way as determined in subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 12585.2 for lands required for the project which were acquired not more than five years prior to federal authorization of the project. The amount of this credit shall be determined by the department or the board by applying the percentage representing the state portion of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way as determined in subdivision (a) of Section 12585.2 to the actual costs of the local agency in the case of acquisition by purchase or condemnation, and to the fair market value at the time the title is transferred in the case of acquisition free of charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.4.

Whenever specifically authorized by the Legislature, the department or the board may lend the local agency the funds necessary to pay the local portion of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way determined in subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 12585.2, less any credit for previously acquired lands determined under Section 12585.3. The state loan may not exceed a period of 10 years and the rate of interest on the loan shall be the current rate for the state’s Pooled Money Investment Account. The loan shall be repaid in annual installments beginning one year after the loan is made. The annual loan payment may be deducted from the state’s annual tax subvention to the local agency, if any. In the event that the local agency does not receive tax subventions from the state adequate to make the loan payment and becomes in default on the loan payments, the local agency, notwithstanding any other provisions of any statute limiting its tax ceiling, shall levy sufficient taxes to repay the loan. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any local agency authorized to participate in the construction of federal flood control projects is authorized to accept the loans authorized pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12800), and this chapter, the following policy shall apply to projects authorized by the Legislature after January 1, 1987, and to small flood control projects authorized by Section 12750 for which the department made the findings required by Section 12750.1 after January 1, 1987:

(a) The state shall pay 70 percent of the nonfederal capital costs required by Section 103(a) of Public Law 99-662.

(b) The state shall pay 70 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of fish and wildlife mitigation.

(c) The state shall pay 70 percent of the nonfederal planning and engineering costs required by Section 105(b) and the nonfederal design costs required by Section 105(c) of Public Law 99-662.

(d) The local agency may receive credit against its share of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way, as determined in subdivision (a), for lands required for the project which were acquired not more than five years prior to federal authorization of the project. The amount of this credit shall be determined by the department or the Reclamation Board by applying the 70 percent state portion as determined in subdivision (a) to the actual costs of the local agency in the case of acquisition by purchase or condemnation and to the fair market value at the time the title is transferred in the case of acquisition free of charge.

(e) The state payments under subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) are subject to Section 12585.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1251, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.6.

For projects authorized by the Legislature prior to January 1, 1987, or for small flood control projects authorized by Section 12750 for which the department made the findings required by Section 12750.1 prior to January 1, 1987, which have been determined by the Corps of Engineers to be subject to the nonfederal costs of Sections 103(a), 105(b), and 105(c) of Public Law 99-662, the state shall pay the costs specified in Section 12585.2 or in Section 12585.5, at the election of the local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1251, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12800), the following requirements apply to projects authorized by the Legislature on or after January 1, 2002, and to small flood management projects authorized by Section 12750 for which the department makes the findings required by Section 12750.1 on or after January 1, 2002.

(a) The state shall pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs required by Section 2213 of Title 33 of the United States Code.

(b) The state shall pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of fish, wildlife, and recreation
 mitigation.

(c) The state shall pay 50 percent of the nonfederal planning and engineering costs required by Section 2215(b) of Title 33 of the United States Code and the nonfederal design costs required by Section 2215(c) of Title 33 of the United States Code.

(d) The state share of the nonfederal capital costs authorized in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) may be increased by up to an additional 20 percent, to a maximum of 70 percent, upon the recommendation of the department or the Central Valley Flood Protection Board, if either entity determines that the project will result in a significant contribution to any of the following objectives:

(1) Protects, creates, enhances, or provides opportunities for enhancement of endangered species, riparian, aquatic, terrestrial, or other important habitats.

(2) Protects or enhances open space.

(3) Develops or enhances recreational opportunities that include, but shall not be limited to, picnic areas, foot and bike paths, and provides public access to all or nearly all of the project works, except those areas where public access would constitute a threat to public safety or habitat or would constitute a trespass on private property.

(4) Increases the level of flood protection for disadvantaged communities, as defined in Section 79505.5.

(5) Increases the level of flood protection for state transportation facilities or state water supply facilities.

(e) (1) The department or Central Valley Flood Protection Board shall include their recommendations with regard to increased cost sharing in the report prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12582.7, if so prepared, or in any addendum to that report.

(2) The department or Central Valley Flood Protection Board shall determine whether the project
 will result in a significant contribution to the prescribed objectives based upon substantial evidence in the record. The department shall develop, by regulation pursuant to Section 12601, criteria for making the determinations as to whether projects will make significant contributions to the objectives described in subdivision (d).

(f) The state payments under subdivisions (a) and (b) are subject to Section 12585.1. State payments under subdivision (c) are not subject to Section 12585.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   (AB 1788)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.8.

For all projects funded in accordance with Section 12585.7, the local agency shall receive credit against its share for the value of the lands, easements, and rights-of-way, for lands required for the project, to the extent authorized under federal law. The amount of the credit shall be determined by the department or the Reclamation Board by applying the percentage amount determined in 12585.7 to the actual amount of any credit determined by the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.9.

The department or the Reclamation Board shall review flood control projects prior to authorization for the purposes of determining whether the project’s individual and cumulative hydraulic impacts are mitigated, as required by Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code. The department or the Reclamation Board shall include the determination in the report to the Legislature required by subdivision (b) of Section 12582.7, if the report is prepared.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.10.

Section 161 does not apply to the adoption or revision of regulations, guidelines, or criteria to implement Section 12582.7 and 12585.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 606, Sec. 8.   Effective October 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12585.12.

The department and the board may participate with the federal government or local agencies in the design of environmental enhancements associated with a federal flood control project, and may participate in the construction of environmental enhancements associated with a federal flood control project for which the state has authorized state participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12586.

It is the intention of the Legislature that nothing in Chapters 1 and 2 of this part shall be deemed to change the policy of the State respecting that certain contract entered into between the Federal Government and the State of California made pursuant to an act of Congress of the United States, approved May 15, 1928 (Public, Numbered 391, Seventy-seventh Congress, First Session, 45 Statutes at Large 534, Chapter 569), and an act of the Legislature, approved May 4, 1925 (Chapter 176, Statutes of 1925, Section 8525 of this code), nor shall anything in Chapters 1 and 2 of this part be deemed or construed to modify, limit or take away from the powers and duties vested in the department by any law or in the Reclamation Board pursuant to the provisions of Part 4, Division 5, of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administrative Provisions [12601. - 12612.]

12601.

The department shall establish general policies, prescribe rules and regulations for the general administration of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part, and may require such information as it deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12602.

The department, or a representative authorized by the department to do so, may call, conduct or attend conferences or hearings, official or unofficial, within or without this state, or otherwise participate in such conferences or hearings, with interested persons, agencies or officers, of this or any other state, or with the Congress of the United States, congressional committees, or officials of the federal government, concerning water projects, plans, or problems. However, where the appropriations committees of the Congress are hearing requests for appropriations for flood control projects being planned or constructed in California under the jurisdiction of the United States Army Corps of Engineers, or reclamation projects being planned or constructed in California by the Bureau of Reclamation, United States Department of the Interior, the California Water Commission shall present its views. Prior to making such presentation, the commission shall consult with interested local, state, and federal agencies, and may on request report to the committees the views of any county, city, state agency, or public district regarding such appropriations. The commission may, on request, represent any local agencies before such committees. Nothing in this section or in Section 12604.3 shall be deemed or construed to modify, limit, or take away from any of the powers and duties vested in the department, or any other state agency, pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1041.)
-------------------------------------------

12603.

The department shall keep itself informed as to any activities, requirements or procedures of the United States, its departments or agencies affecting any proposed water project within the scope of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part, including flood control, water conservation, domestic and irrigation use, and power development, but not excluding other uses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12604.

As to any matter involving the United States, its departments or agencies, which is within the scope of the powers and duties of the department, the department may represent the interests of the State or any county, city, state agency or public district, and to that end may correspond, confer and cooperate with the United States, its departments or agencies, and where necessary the director, or his authorized representative, may travel either within or without the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12604.3.

In matters concerning the coordination of planning, construction, and operation of federal water development and flood control projects in the State of California with state and local projects, the California Water Commission shall advise the department, and the Governor, and to this end may confer with the appropriate executive agencies of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

12606.

The department may hold hearings and conduct investigations in any part of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12608.

At any hearing by or on behalf of the department any county, city, state agency, including the Department of Fish and Game, public district, association, or any person affected by or interested in the control, storage, and use of water resources, involved in the hearing may appear and present any petition, evidence, testimony, plan, data, information, or opinion bearing on the subject matter of the hearing including an evaluation of loss and damage to fish and other natural resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12609.

As a further means of carrying out the policies defined in Sections 12578 to 12582, inclusive, the department shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) Collect and file data.

(b) Make necessary studies and surveys.

(c) Make investigations.

(d) Prepare plans and estimates of cost and benefits of all proposed water development projects.

(e) Determine the damage created by flood waters.

(f) Encourage the creation and development of flood control and water conservation plans and activities of the several counties, cities, state agencies, and public districts.

(g) Cooperate with the United States or any of its departments or agencies in carrying out measures for control, storage or use of waters on streams, rivers or other waterways, and the watersheds thereof within this State which are authorized and adopted pursuant to an act of Congress of the United States, approved June 22, 1936, entitled “An act authorizing the construction of certain public works on rivers and harbors for flood control, and for other purposes,” together with amendatory or supplemental legislation adopted by Congress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12610.

In performing the duties prescribed in Section 12609, the director, or his authorized representative, may travel either within or without the State and shall consult and cooperate with the officials and engineers of the counties, cities, state agencies, or public districts affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12611.

The department may cooperate with any county, city, state agency or public district on flood control and other water problems and when requested by such county, city, state agency or public district, may enter into cooperative agreements to prepare plans and specifications, construct, or maintain and operate projects or expend money in behalf of such county, city, state agency or public district, to accomplish the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12612.

The department has no authority to undertake the construction of flood control or other water projects provided for under Chapters 1 and 2 of this part, thereby obligating any county, city, state agency, or public district in any way except upon the formal request of such county, city, state agency or public district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Investigation of Water Development Projects [12616. - 12634.3.]

12616.

The department may conduct investigations of the water resources of the State, formulate plans for the control, conservation, protection, and utilization of such water resources, including solutions for the water problems of each portion of the State as deemed expedient and economically feasible, and may render reports thereon. In conducting such investigations and formulating such plans, the department may conduct investigations and surveys to determine the availability, usability, extents, and boundaries of underground basins.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12617.

The department, upon its own initiative, or when requested in writing by a county, city, state agency or public district, may investigate, conduct surveys and studies, prepare plans and estimates, and render reports concerning control, conservation, protection, and utilization of water resources, including recommendations for plans and projects. The department may at any time in its discretion enlarge or restrict the scope of any investigation, survey or study as it may determine the public interest requires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12617.1.

The department, in making investigations and plans for water projects and for the solution of the water problems of the state pursuant to Sections 12616 and 12617, shall include plans and recommendations for the protection of the quality of the waters affected, including downstream waters, with respect to all sources of impairment and factors affecting quality. In doing so, the department shall cooperate with counties, cities, state agencies, and public districts to the end that planning for water quality control shall be coordinated to the maximum extent possible. Such plans and recommendations shall be transmitted to the State Water Resources Control Board and to the appropriate California regional water quality control boards for their consideration in the adoption of state policy for water quality control, water quality control plans, and waste discharge requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

12618.

The department may recommend the construction of any project, including the time for constructing it, and the amount of funds which should be allocated or appropriated to counties, cities, state agencies or public districts for the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12619.

Reports and recommendations shall be submitted by the department to each county, city, state agency, or public district which has appeared at any hearing held pursuant to Section 12623.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12620.

Within 90 days from the date of submission of the report and recommendations of the department, or within such extended period as the department may grant for good cause shown, the written views and recommendations of each county, city, state agency or public district which has appeared at any hearing may be submitted to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12621.

After the expiration of the period or extended period for the submission of written views and recommendations, or prior thereto in the event all those entitled to submit written views and recommendations have done so, or have signified their intention not to do so, the department shall transmit (1) the department’s report and recommendations to the Governor and to the Legislature together with (2) any submitted views and recommendations of the county, city, state agency, or public district and together with (3) such supplementary report and recommendations as the department may deem appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12622.

Investigations which form the basis of any reports and recommendations of the department shall be conducted to the extent deemed practicable by the department in such a manner as to give to any interested county, city, state agency or district during the course of the investigations, information developed by the investigations, and opportunity for consultation and cooperation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12623.

Prior to adoption of any report and recommendations authorized pursuant to Sections 12616 to 12622, inclusive, and Section 12626, the department shall hold a hearing or hearings pursuant to this part and give notice thereof as provided for in Sections 12632, 12633, and 12634.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12624.

In making recommendation to the Legislature respecting the amount of financial assistance to be given by the State, as provided for in Sections 12616 to 12623, inclusive, and Section 12626, the department shall recommend the total estimated amount which should be paid by the State for lands, easements and rights of way necessary in connection with the construction of any such project, and what proportion, if any, of the cost of the project should be paid by the county, city, state agency, or public district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12625.

In determining the cost of any project, damage to fish and wildlife that will probably result shall be included in the amount of the cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 672.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

12626.

Reports and recommendations made by the department shall be advisory only and the Legislature shall finally determine the priorities in building such projects and the amount of aid to each project which is approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12627.

It is the intention of the Legislature that the department shall investigate all phases of any proposed water project, including flood control, water conservation, domestic and irrigation use, and power development, but not excluding other uses, so that a county, city, state agency, or public district affected, and the Legislature, may have the benefit of investigations and recommendations of the department upon such projects in order to assure the fullest development of the water resources of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12627.3.

It is declared to be the policy of the State that the costs of solution of seepage and erosion problems which arise or will arise by reason of construction and operation of water projects should be borne by the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2128.)
-------------------------------------------

12627.4.

The department, in making investigations and plans for water projects and in making recommendations thereon to the Governor and the Legislature, shall include therein consideration of seepage and erosion problems which may arise in connection with the construction and operation of the proposed project, the effect of the proposed project thereon, and plans for the solution thereof as a part of the project development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2128.)
-------------------------------------------

12628.

In a multiple-type project authorized and adopted by Congress, which includes, in addition to works for flood control purposes, works and construction for other than flood control purposes, only that portion of the project which is deemed by the department to be necessary for flood control purposes shall be eligible for financial assistance from the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12629.

In a multiple-type project which includes works and construction for flood control and for other than flood control purposes, and in projects which do not include any flood control works or construction, the department may recommend to the Legislature and to the United States, or any of its departments or agencies, the method of financing such works and construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12630.

Prior to recommending to the Legislature the approval for state assistance of any project, designed in whole or in part for flood control, adopted and authorized by Congress, and prior to the submission to the Legislature of an estimate of the total cost to the State, and prior to recommending an appropriation by the State in aid of any such project approved for state assistance by the Legislature, the department shall obtain from the appropriate agency of the Federal Government an estimate of the total cost of the project and the cost and benefit ratio, based upon then current construction costs and values, and shall submit the same to the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12631.

The department, in addition to the reports and recommendations made to the Legislature as provided in Sections 12616 to 12623, inclusive, and Section 12626, may from time to time summarize the results of its investigations, studies, activities, and recommendations relating to flood control and other water problems and report to the Governor, and may publish the report in such form as it deems suitable to inform the people of the State concerning such flood control and other water problems as come within the scope of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12632.

Prior to any hearing and prior to beginning any investigation of the water problems of any specific portion of the State pursuant to Section 12616 or any investigation pursuant to Section 12617, the department shall give such notice to the agencies or persons likely to be interested as it deems necessary to afford every opportunity for the agencies or persons to be heard, and in addition to such notice shall give further notice of any hearing or investigation by mail to any city, county, state agency, or public district, deemed likely by the department to be interested, which has filed its official name and address with the department together with a request for notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12633.

Notice, to those who have filed and requested service by mail, shall be sent to the respective addresses of record at the time of mailing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12634.

Notice given as provided in Sections 12632 and 12633 shall be deemed full and sufficient notice to all parties in interest of the hearing or investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12634.3.

The department shall submit, prior to January 1st of each year, a report to the California Water Commission summarizing its activities, with emphasis on existing and prospective planning projects, the need for such projects, and the estimated costs thereof. The commission may conduct public hearings on such reports and may make recommendations thereon to the department and the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1041.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Approved Projects [12639. - 12751.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12639. - 12643.]

12639.

The works of improvement for the control, conservation and utilization of destructive flood waters and the reclamation and protection of lands that are susceptible to overflow by flood waters, which are described in this chapter, are adopted and authorized in the interest of the public welfare of the people of this State to be prosecuted substantially in accordance with the plans in the respective reports designated in this chapter.

If, however, there are any major project changes in the plan of improvement originally approved by the Congress and adopted and authorized by the State, which changes result in a substantial increase in